District of Columbia statutes.
23-1111

Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter shall be fined not less than $50 and not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned for not less than ten nor more than sixty days, or both, where no other penalty is provided by this chapter; and if the person so convicted is (1) a police officer or other public official, he shall upon recommendation of the trial judge also be forthwith dismissed from office, (2) a bondsman, he shall be disqualified from thereafter engaging in any manner in the bonding business for such a period of time as the trial judge shall order, or (3) an attorney at law, he shall be subject to suspension or disbarment as attorney at law.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 283(f), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 23-1111.
1973 Ed., § 23-1111.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “nor more than $100”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 283(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.